Massachusetts, session 194th, H2895.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority
of the same, as follows:
Section 7(c)(i) of Chapter 372 of the Acts of 1984 of the General Laws shall be amended
by striking out the following words:- “employment, assignment and promotion of employees and
the determination of standards therefore”. Subsections (ii) through (v) shall be renumbered
accordingly.
of 1